Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Legislative  Administration Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for payment
of the expenses of the Legislative Administration Committee, for the following purposes:
(1) General program ....................... $ 24,336,204
(2) Debt service .............................. $ 12,873,776
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee:
(1) General program.......................  $ 2,453,495
(2) Debt service ..............................  $ 1,192,375
SECTION 3. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by  the Legislative
Administration Committee from the Stores  Revolving Account and the Property and Supplies
Stores Account established in ORS 173.790 are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $300,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for  expenses related to the Oregon Capitol History Gateway from the
Oregon Capitol History Gateway Fund.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $25,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for expenses related to operations  for the Oregon State Capitol
Foundation from the Oregon State Capitol Foundation Operating Fund.
SECTION 6.
There is appropriated to the  Legislative Assembly, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $14,345,214 for  payment of the ex-
penses of the following offices:
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 1
(1) The offices of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Repre-
sentatives;
(2) The majority and minority offices of the Senate and of the House  of Representatives;
and
(3) The offices of the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the House of Rep-
resentatives.
SECTION 7. (1) There is appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $18,041,769 for payment of the
expenses of members of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
(2) There is  appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,305,980 for payment of  the expenses of
members of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $26,570
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 9.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by  the Legislative
Assembly from the  Lounge Revolving Account established in ORS 171.117, for the costs of
food served in members’ lounges and  reimbursed through receipts on the basis of sales or
by payroll deductions from members, are not limited.
SECTION 10. There is appropriated to the Legislative Counsel Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $12,785,719.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,638,291 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Counsel
Committee.
SECTION 12. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, expenditures by the Legislative
Counsel Committee from the ORS Revolving Account established in ORS 171.305 and  from
the Legislative Publications Account established  in ORS 171.245, for services and supplies
connected with printing  and distributing legislative publications and the Oregon Revised
Statutes, are not limited.
SECTION 13. (1) There is appropriated  to the Legislative Fiscal Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,301,378.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $3,779,805 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
SECTION 14. There is appropriated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,892,462.
SECTION 15. There is appropriated to the Legislative  Revenue Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,036,432.
SECTION 16. There is appropriated to the Commission  on Indian Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $539,068.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $7,035
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Commission on Indian
Services.
SECTION 18.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 2
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 3